District of Columbia statutes.
15-103

Effect of revival.

An order of revival issued upon a judgment or decree during the period of twelve years from the rendition or from the date of an order reviving the judgment or decree, extends the effect and operation of the judgment or decree with the lien thereby created and all the remedies for its enforcement for the period of twelve years from the date of the order.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 523, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 15-103.
1981 Ed., § 15-103.
Levy of attachment upon specific property as prerequisite to condemnation and sale, see § 16-555.